Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6227
Rules and regulations; professional and clerical services; expenses.

(1) The director may, with the advice of the board, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act.

(2) The director shall provide all necessary professional and clerical services to assist the committees and the board. Records of all official actions and minutes of all business coming before the committees and the board shall be kept. The director shall be the custodian of all records, documents, and other property of the committees and the board.

(3) Committee members shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 27;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 69.